test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj_Likestavelser_S_adjektiv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
  Adjective - aelmies: #
    aelmies+A+Attr: aelmies
#    aelmies+A+Sg+Nom: åålmehke

  Adjective - aelpies: #
    aelpies+A+Attr: aelpies
    aelpies+A+Sg+Nom: [aelpie]
    aelpies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aelpebe
    aelpies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: aelpemes

  Adjective - aerkies: # ?
    aerkies+A+Attr: aerkies
    aerkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aerkie]
    aerkies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aerkebe
    aerkies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: aerkemes

  Adjective - aevhkies: #
    aevhkies+A+Attr: aevhkies
    aevhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aevhkie]
    aevhkies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aevhkebe
    aevhkies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: aevhkemes

  Adjective - daemies: #
    daemies+A+Attr: daemies
    daemies+A+Sg+Nom: daemies

  Adjective - daerpies: #
    daerpies+A+Attr: daerpies
    daerpies+A+Sg+Nom: daerpies

  Adjective - dearkoeh: #
    dearkoeh+A+Attr: [dearkoeh, dearkah]
    dearkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkehke, dearkohke]
    dearkoeh+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkoehkåbpoe, dearkahkabpa]
    dearkoeh+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkoehkommes, dearkahkammes]

  Adjective - beagkoes: #
    beagkoes+A+Attr: beagkoes
    beagkoes+A+Sg+Nom: beagkoes

  Adjective - dovre: # c
    dovre+A+Attr: [dovres, dovre]
    dovre+A+Sg+Nom: dovres
    dovre+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [dovrebe, dovresabpa, dovresåbpoe]
    dovre+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [dovremes, dovresammes, dovresommes]

  Adjective - dulvies: #
    dulvies+A+Attr: dulvies
#    dulvies+A+Sg+Nom: [dulvie] # Original
    dulvies+A+Sg+Nom: [dulvie, dulvies] # dulvies må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    dulvies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dulvebe
    dulvies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dulvemes

  Adjective - dolvehke: #
#    dolvehke+A+Attr: dolve
    dolvehke+A+Sg+Nom: [dolvehke]
    dolvehke+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [dolvehkåbpoe, dolvehkabpa]
    dolvehke+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [dolvehkommes, dolvehkammes]

  Adjective - duvhties: #
    duvhties+A+Attr: duvhties
#    duvhties+A+Sg+Nom: [] # duvhties
#   duvhties+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: duvhtebe
#    duvhties+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: duvhtemes

#  Adjective - eejles: #
#    eejles+A+Attr: aejlies
#    eejles+A+Sg+Nom: aejlege

  Adjective - ellies: #
    ellies+A+Attr: ellies

  Adjective - elmies: #
    elmies+A+Attr: elmies
    elmies+A+Sg+Nom: [elmie]

  Adjective - faatoes: #
    faatoes+A+Sg+Nom: faatoes

  Adjective - fahkoes: #
    fahkoes+A+Attr: [fahkoes, fahkas]
    fahkoes+A+Sg+Nom: [fahkan, fahkoes, fahkas]

  Adjective - gaavnoes: #
    gaavnoes+A+Sg+Nom: gaavnoes

  Adjective - gaelhvies: #
    gaelhvies+A+Attr: gaelhvies
    gaelhvies+A+Sg+Nom: [gaelhvie]
    gaelhvies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gaelhvebe
    gaelhvies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gaelhvemes

  Adjective - gaertjies: #
    gaertjies+A+Attr: gaertjies
    gaertjies+A+Sg+Nom: [gaertjie]
    gaertjies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gaertjebe
    gaertjies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gaertjemes

  Adjective - gaervies: #
    gaervies+A+Attr: gaervies
    gaervies+A+Sg+Nom: gaervies

  Adjective - geehpes: # SNM:
    geehpes+A+Attr: geehpes
#    geehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [giehpie, gyöhpehke]
#    geehpes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [giehpebe,gyöhpehkåbpoe, gyöhpehkabpa]
#    geehpes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [giehpemes, gyöhpehkommes, gyöhpehkammes]

  Adjective - giehpies: # SNM:
    giehpies+A+Attr: giehpies
    giehpies+A+Sg+Nom: giehpie
    giehpies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: giehpebe
    giehpies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: giehpemes

  Adjective - geeles: #
    geeles+A+Attr: geeles
    geeles+A+Sg+Nom: [geeles, gåålehke]
    geeles+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gåålehkåbpoe, gåålehkabpa]
    geeles+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gåålehkommes, gåålehkammes]

  Adjective - geljies: #
    geljies+A+Attr: geljies
    geljies+A+Sg+Nom: geljie
    geljies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: geljebe
    geljies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: geljemes

  Adjective - giedtsies: #
    giedtsies+A+Attr: giedtsies
#    giedtsies+A+Sg+Nom: [giedtsie, gyödtsehke] # Original
    giedtsies+A+Sg+Nom: [giedtsie, gyödtsehke, giedtsies] # giedtsies må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    giedtsies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [giedtsebe, gyödtsehkabpa, gyödtsehkåbpoe]
    giedtsies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [giedtsemes, gyödtsehkommes, gyödtsehkammes]

  Adjective - giefies: #
    giefies+A+Attr: giefies
#    giefies+A+Sg+Nom: [giefie, gyöfehke]
#    giefies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [giefebe, gyöfehkåbpoe, gyöfehkabpa]
#    giefies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [giefemes, gyöfehkommes, gyöfehkammes]

  Adjective - guelhties: #
    guelhties+A+Attr: guelhties
    guelhties+A+Sg+Nom: [guelhtie]
    guelhties+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: guelhtebe
    guelhties+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guelhtemes

  Adjective - guhkies: # c
    guhkies+A+Attr: guhkies
    guhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [guhkie]
    guhkies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: guhkebe
    guhkies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guhkemes

  Adjective - gåaroes: #
    gåaroes+A+Attr: [gåaroes, gåaras]
    gåaroes+A+Sg+Nom: [gåaroes, gåaras]

  Adjective - hearskoes: #
    hearskoes+A+Attr: [hearskoes, hearskas]
    hearskoes+A+Sg+Nom: [hearskoe, hearska]
    hearskoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [hearskobe, hearskebe]
    hearskoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [hearskomes, hearskemes]

  Adjective - hujnies: #
    hujnies+A+Attr: hujnies

  Adjective - håjnoes: #
    håjnoes+A+Attr: håjnoes

  Adjective - hajnas: #
    hajnas+A+Attr: hajnas

  Adjective - jolle: # c
    jolle+A+Attr: jolle
    jolle+A+Sg+Nom: [jolle, jollehke]
    jolle+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [jollebe, jollehkåbpoe, jollehkabpa]
    jolle+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [jollemes, jollehkammes, jollehkommes]

  Adjective - jorpe: #
    jorpe+A+Attr: jorpe
    jorpe+A+Sg+Nom: jorpe
    jorpe+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jorpebe
    jorpe+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jorpemes

  Adjective - jovje: #
    jovje+A+Attr: jovje
    jovje+A+Sg+Nom: jovje
    jovje+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jovjebe
    jovje+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jovjemes

  Adjective - jueskies: # c
    jueskies+A+Attr: jueskies
    jueskies+A+Sg+Nom: [jueskie]
    jueskies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jueskebe
    jueskies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jueskemes

  Adjective - jïlle: #
    jïlle+A+Attr: jïlle
    jïlle+A+Sg+Nom: jïlle
    jïlle+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jïllebe
    jïlle+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jïllemes
#    jïlle+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jïlletjåbpoe, jïlletjabpa]
#    jïlle+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jïlletjommes, jïlletjammes]

  Adjective - jalle: #
    jalle+A+Attr: jalle
    jalle+A+Sg+Nom: jalle
    jalle+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jallebe
    jalle+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jallemes
#    jalle+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jallatjåbpoe, jallatjabpa]
#    jalle+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jallatjommes, jallatjammes]

  Adjective - jolle: #
    jolle+A+Attr: jolle
    jolle+A+Sg+Nom:  jolle
    jolle+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jollebe
    jolle+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jollemes
#    jolle+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jolletjåbpoe, jolletjabpa]
#    jolle+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [jolletjommes, jolletjammes]

  Adjective - klaeries: #
    klaeries+A+Attr: klaeries
#    klaeries+A+Sg+Nom: [klaerie] # Original
    klaeries+A+Sg+Nom: [klaerie, klaeries] # klaeries må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    klaeries+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: klaerebe
    klaeries+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: klaeremes

  Adjective - kraejhpies: #
    kraejhpies+A+Attr: kraejhpies
    kraejhpies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraejhpie]
    kraejhpies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: kraejhpebe
    kraejhpies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: kraejhpemes

  Adjective - kraevies: #
#    kraevies+A+Attr: kraevies # Original
    kraevies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraevies]
    kraevies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraevies, kraevie] # kraevie må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    kraevies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: kraevebe
    kraevies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: kraevemes

  Adjective - kroenes: #
    kroenes+A+Attr: kroenes

  Adjective - kruepies: #
    kruepies+A+Attr: kruepies
    kruepies+A+Sg+Nom: [kruepie]
    kruepies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: kruepebe
    kruepies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: kruepemes

  Adjective - laemies: #
    laemies+A+Attr: laemies
    laemies+A+Sg+Nom: [laemie, laemies]

  Adjective - latjke: #
    latjke+A+Attr: [latjke, latjkes]

  Adjective - liehties: # c
    liehties+A+Attr: liehties
#    liehties+A+Sg+Nom: [liehtie] # Original
    liehties+A+Sg+Nom: [liehtie, liehties] # liehties må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    liehties+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: liehtebe
    liehties+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: liehtemes

  Adjective - loeves: # c
    loeves+A+Attr: loeves
    loeves+A+Sg+Nom: loeves
    loeves+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: loevebe
    loeves+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: loevemes

  Adjective - låemties: #
    låemties+A+Attr: låemties
    låemties+A+Sg+Nom: [låemtie]
    låemties+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: låemtebe
    låemties+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: låemtemes

  Adjective - låpsoes: #
    låpsoes+A+Attr: låpsoes
    låpsoes+A+Sg+Nom: låpsoes

  Adjective - lustes: # c
    lustes+A+Attr: lustes
#    lustes+A+Sg+Nom: [luste] # Original
    lustes+A+Sg+Nom: [luste, lustes] # lustes må sjekkast med sma-lingvist
    lustes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: lustebe
    lustes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lustemes

  Adjective - lïhkes: # c
    lïhkes+A+Attr: lïhkes
    lïhkes+A+Sg+Nom: lïhkes
    lïhkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: lïhkebe
    lïhkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lïhkemes

  Adjective - löövles: # SNM: duplicate forms in Comp and Superl
    löövles+A+Attr: löövles
    löövles+A+Sg+Nom: löövles
    löövles+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: löövlebe
    löövles+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: löövlemes

  Adjective - lïevles: # SNM: duplicate forms in Comp and Superl
    lïevles+A+Attr: lïevles
    lïevles+A+Sg+Nom: lïevles
    lïevles+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: lïevlebe
    lïevles+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lïevlemes

  Adjective - lyövles: # SNM: duplicate forms in Comp and Superl
    lyövles+A+Attr: lyövles
    lyövles+A+Sg+Nom: lyövles
    lyövles+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: lyövlebe
    lyövles+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lyövlemes

  Adjective - miehtjies: #
    miehtjies+A+Attr: miehtjies

  Adjective - måasas: #
    måasas+A+Attr: [måasas, måasoes]
    måasas+A+Sg+Nom: [måasa, måasoe]
    måasas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: måasebe
    måasas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: måasemes

  Adjective - måaskes: #
    måaskes+A+Attr: måaskes
    måaskes+A+Sg+Nom: måaskes
    måaskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: måaskebe
    måaskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: måaskemes

  Adjective - måskoes: #
    måskoes+A+Attr: [måskoes, måskas]
    måskoes+A+Sg+Nom: [måskoes, måskas]

  Adjective - möövhkes: #
    möövhkes+A+Attr: möövhkes
    möövhkes+A+Sg+Nom: möövhkes
    möövhkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: möövhkebe
    möövhkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: möövhkemes

  Adjective - njaelkies: #
    njaelkies+A+Attr: njaelkies
    njaelkies+A+Sg+Nom: [njaelkie]
    njaelkies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: njaelkebe
    njaelkies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: njaelkemes

  Adjective - njeerpes: # SNM: duplicate forms
    njeerpes+A+Attr: njeerpes
    njeerpes+A+Sg+Nom: [njeerpes, njåårpehke]
    njeerpes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [njeerpebe, njeerpesåbpoe, njåårpehkabpa, njeerpesabpa, njåårpehkåbpoe]
    njeerpes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [njeerpemes, njeerpesommes, njåårpehkammes, njåårpehkommes, njeerpesammes]

  Adjective - nåake: # c
    nåake+A+Attr: nåake
    nåake+A+Sg+Nom: nåake
    nåake+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nåakebe, vearrebe, vïerrebe]
    nåake+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nåakemes, vearremes, vïerremes, veerremes]

  Adjective - nåekies: #
    nåekies+A+Attr: nåekies
    nåekies+A+Sg+Nom: [nåekie]
    nåekies+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: nåekebe
    nåekies+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: nåekemes

  Adjective - nænnoes: # c Inkons. vi skal ha nænnas, men ikke nænnasabpa?
    nænnoes+A+Attr: nænnoes
    nænnoes+A+Sg+Nom: [nænnoes]
#    nænnoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nænnobe, nennebe, nænnoesåbpoe, nænnebe]
#    nænnoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nænnomes, nennemes, nænnoesommes, nænnemes]
